Rhode Island statutes. Title 18 Fiduciaries
Chapter 16 Rhode Island Short Form Power of Attorney Act

18-16-1.
Use of statutory form.

The statutory form of short form power of attorney, as set forth in §

18-16-2

, may be used in the creation of a power of attorney for the purposes set forth in that section; and when used and created, shall be construed in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 375, § 1.

18-16-2.
Statutory short form power of attorney.

The statutory short form power of attorney is as follows:

The execution of this statutory short form power of attorney shall be duly acknowledged by the principal in the manner prescribed for the acknowledgement of a conveyance of real property.

No provision of this chapter shall be construed to bar the use of any other or different form of power of attorney desired by the parties concerned.

Every statutory short form power of attorney shall contain, in bold face type or a reasonable equivalent of it, the “Notice” at the beginning of this section.

A power of attorney is a “statutory short form power of attorney,” as this phrase is used in this chapter, when it is in writing, has been duly acknowledged by the principal and contains the exact wording of clause First set forth in subsection (a) of this section, except that any one or more of subdivisions (A) to (J) of the form may be stricken out and initialed by the principal, in which case the subdivisions stricken out and initialed and also subdivision (J) of the form shall be deemed eliminated. A statutory short form power of attorney may contain modifications or additions to the types described in § 18-16-15.

If more than one agent is designated by the principal, the agents, in the exercise of the powers conferred, shall act jointly unless the principal specifically provides in the statutory short form power of attorney that they are to act severally.

SHORT FORM POWER OF ATTORNEY WARNING TO PERSON EXECUTING THIS DOCUMENT This is an important legal document which is authorized by the general laws of this state. The powers granted by this document are broad and sweeping. They are defined in to , both inclusive, of the general laws in chapter 18-16 entitled “Rhode Island Short Form Power of Attorney Act.” §§

18-16-1

18-16-12

The use of the short form power of attorney is strictly voluntary, and chapter 18-16 specifically authorizes the use of any other or different form of power of attorney upon mutual agreement of the parties concerned. Known All Men by These Presents, which are intended to constitute a GENERAL POWER OF ATTORNEY pursuant to the Rhode Island Short Form Power of Attorney Act: That I (insert name and address of the principal) do hereby appoint (insert name and address of the agent, or each agent, if more than one is designated) my attorney(s)-in-fact TO ACT. (If more than one agent is designated and the principal wishes each agent alone to be able to exercise the power conferred, insert in this blank the word “severally”. Failure to make any insertion or the insertion of the word “jointly” shall require the agents to act jointly.) First: In my name, place and stead in any way which I myself could do, if I were personally present, with respect to the following matters as each of them is defined in the Rhode Island Statutory Short Form Power of Attorney Act to the extent that I am permitted by law to act through an agent: (STRIKE OUT AND INITIAL ON THE OPPOSITE LINE ANY ONE OR MORE OF THE SUBDIVISIONS AS TO WHICH THE PRINCIPAL DOES NOT DESIRE TO GIVE THE AGENT AUTHORITY. SUCH ELIMINATION OF ANY ONE OR MORE OF SUBDIVISIONS (A) TO (I), INCLUSIVE, SHALL AUTOMATICALLY CONSTITUTE AN ELIMINATION ALSO OF SUBDIVISION (J). To strike out any subdivision the principal must draw a line through the text of that subdivision AND write his initials in the line opposite. INITIAL HERE (A) real state transactions; (B) chattel and goods transactions; (C) bond, share and commodity transactions; (D) banking transactions; (E) business operating transactions; (F) insurance transactions; (G) claims and litigations; (H) benefits from military service; (I) records, reports and statements; (J) all other matters; (Special provisions and limitations may be included in the statutory short form power of attorney only if they conform to the requirements of the Rhode Island Statutory Short Form Power of Attorney Act.) Second: This power of attorney shall: (A) be of indefinite duration or (B) terminate on the following date, , unless otherwise terminated by revocation, destruction or other affirmative action. Third: Hereby ratifying and confirming all that said attorney(s) or substitute(s) do or cause to be done. In witness whereof I have hereunto signed my name and affixed my seal this day of 20. (Signature of Principal) (Seal) (ACKNOWLEDGEMENT) This power of attorney shall not be affected by the subsequent incompetency of the donor. In witness whereof I have hereunto signed my name and affixed my seal this day of 20. (Signature of Principal) (Seal) (ACKNOWLEDGEMENT)

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 375, § 1.

18-16-3.
Real estate transactions.

In a statutory short form power of attorney, the language conferring general authority with respect to real estate transactions shall be construed to mean that the principal authorizes the agent:

To accept as a gift, or as security for a loan, to reject, to demand, to buy, to lease, to receive, or otherwise to acquire either ownership or possession of any estate or interest in land;

To sell, to exchange, to convey either with or without covenants, to quit claim, to release, to surrender, to mortgage, to encumber, to partition or to consent to the partitioning, grant options concerning, to lease or to sublet, or otherwise to dispose of, any estate or interest in land;

To release in whole or in part, to assign the whole or a part of it, to satisfy in whole or in part, and to enforce by action, proceeding or otherwise, any mortgage, encumbrance, lien or other claim to land which exists, or is claimed to exist, in favor of the principal;

To do any act of management or of conservation with respect to any estate or interest in land owned, or claimed to be owned, by the principal, including, but not limited to, power to insure against any casualty, liability or loss, or obtain or to regain possession or to protect any estate or interest by action, proceeding or otherwise, to pay, to compromise or to contest taxes or assessments, to apply for refunds in connection with it, to purchase supplies, to hire assistance or labor and to make repairs or alterations in the structures or lands;

To utilize in any way, to develop, to modify, to alter, to replace, to remove, to erect or to install structures or other improvements upon any land in which the principal has, or claims to have, any estate or interest;

To demand, to receive, to obtain by action, proceeding or otherwise, any money or other thing of value to which the principal is, or may become, or may claim to be, entitled as the proceeds of an interest in land or of one or more of the transactions enumerated in this section, to conserve, to invest, to disburse or to utilize anything received for purposes enumerated in this section, and to be reimbursed for any expenditures properly made by him or her in the execution of the powers conferred on him or her by the statutory short form power of attorney;

To participate in any reorganization with respect to real property and to receive and to hold any shares of stock or instrument of similar character received in accordance with the plan of reorganization, and to act with respect to it, including, but not limited to, power to sell or otherwise to dispose of those shares, or any of them, to exercise or to sell any option, conversion or similar right with respect to the plan of reorganization, and to vote on it in person or by the granting of a proxy;

To agree and to contract, in any manner, and with any person and on any terms, which the agent may select, for the accomplishment of any of the purposes enumerated in this section, and to perform, to rescind, to reform, to release or to modify this agreement or contract or any other similar agreement or contract made by or on behalf of the principal;

To execute, to acknowledge, to seal and to deliver any deed, revocation, declaration, mortgage, lease, notice, check or other instrument which the agent may think useful for the accomplishment of any of the purposes enumerated in this section;

To prosecute, to defend, to submit to arbitration, to settle, and to propose or to accept a compromise with respect to, any claim existing in favor of, or against, the principal based on or involving any real estate transaction or to intervene in any action or proceeding relating to it;

To hire, to discharge, and to compensate any attorney, accountant, expert witness or other assistant or assistants when the agent deems this action to be desirable for the proper execution by him or her of any of the powers described in this section, and for the keeping of needed records of these actions; and

In general, and in addition to all the specific acts enumerated in this section, to do any other act or acts, which the principal can do through an agent, with respect to any estate or interest in land.

All powers described in this section shall be equally exercisable with respect to any estate or interest in land owned by the principal at the giving of the power of attorney or thereafter acquired, whether located in the state of Rhode Island or elsewhere.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 375, § 1.

18-16-4.
Chattel and goods transactions.

In a statutory short form power of attorney, the language conferring general authority with respect to chattel and goods transactions shall be construed to mean that the principal authorizes the agent:

To accept as a gift, or as security for a loan, to reject, to demand, to buy, to receive, or otherwise to acquire either ownership or possession of, any chattel or goods or any interest in any chattel or goods;

To sell, to exchange, to convey either with or without covenants, to release, to surrender, to mortgage, to encumber, to pledge, to hypothecate, to pawn, to revoke, to grant options concerning, to lease or to sublet to others, or otherwise to dispose of any chattel or goods or any interest in any chattel or goods;

To release in whole or in part, to assign the whole or a part of, to satisfy in whole or in part, and to enforce by action, proceeding or otherwise, any mortgage, encumbrance, lien or other claim, which exists, or is claimed to exist, in favor of the principal, with respect to any chattel or goods of any interest in any chattel or goods;

To do any act of management or of conservation, with respect to any chattel or goods or to any interest in any chattel or goods owned, or claimed to be owned, by the principal, including, but not limited to, power to insure against any casualty, liability or loss, to obtain or to regain possession, or to protect any chattel or goods or interest in any chattel or goods, by action, proceeding or otherwise, to pay, to compromise or to contest taxes or assessments, to apply for refunds in connection with any chattel or goods, to move from place to place, to store for hire or on a gratuitous bailment, to use, to alter and to make repairs or alterations of any chattel or goods, or interest in any chattel or goods;

To demand, to receive, to obtain by action, proceeding or otherwise, any money or other thing of value to which the principal is, or may become, or may claim to be, entitled as the proceeds of any chattel or goods or of any interest in any chattel or goods, or of one or more of the transactions enumerated in this section, to conserve, to invest, to disburse or to utilize anything received for purposes enumerated in this section, and to be reimbursed for any expenditures properly made by him or her in the execution of the powers conferred on him or her by the statutory short form power of attorney;

To agree and to contract, in any manner, and with any person and on any terms, which the agent may select, for the accomplishment of any of the purposes enumerated in this section, and to perform, to rescind, to reform, to release or to modify this agreement or contract or any other similar agreement or contract made by or on behalf of the principal;

To execute, to acknowledge, to seal and to deliver any conveyance, revocation, declaration, mortgage, lease, notice, check or other instrument which the agent may think useful for the accomplishment of any of the purposes enumerated in this section;

To prosecute, to defend, to submit to arbitration, to settle, and to propose or to accept a compromise with respect to, any claim existing in favor of, or against, the principal based on or involving any chattel or goods transaction or to intervene in any action or proceedings relating to any claim;

To hire, to discharge and to compensate any attorney, accountant, expert witness or other assistant or assistants when the agent deems this action to be desirable for the proper execution by him or her of any of the powers described in this section, and for the keeping of needed records of these actions; and

In general, and in addition to all the specific acts enumerated in this section, to do any other act or acts, which the principal can do through an agent, with respect to any chattel or goods or interest in any chattel or goods.

All powers described in this section shall be equally exercisable with respect to any chattel or goods or interest in any chattel or goods owned by the principal at the giving of the power of attorney or thereafter acquired, whether located in the state of Rhode Island or elsewhere.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 375, § 1.

18-16-5.
Bond, share and commodity transactions.

In a statutory short form power of attorney, the language conferring general authority with respect to bond, share and commodity transactions shall be construed to mean that the principal authorizes the agent:

To accept as a gift, or as security for a loan, to reject, to demand, to buy, to receive, or otherwise to acquire either ownership or possession of, any bond, share, instrument of similar character, commodity interest or any instrument with respect to it, together with the interest, dividends, proceeds or other distributions connected with it;

To sell, including short sales, exchange, transfer either with or without a guaranty, release, surrender, hypothecate, pledge, grant options concerning, loan, trade in, or otherwise dispose of any bond, share instrument of similar character, commodity interest or any instrument with respect to it;

To release in commodity interest or any instrument with respect to it; to release in whole or in part, assign the whole or a part of, satisfy in whole or in part, and enforce by action, proceeding or otherwise, any pledge, encumbrance, lien or other claim as to any bond, share, instrument of similar character, commodity interest or any interest with respect to it, when the pledge, encumbrance, lien or other claim is owned, or claimed to be owned, by the principal;

To do any act of management or of conservation with respect to any bond, share, instrument of similar character, commodity interest or any instrument with respect to it, owned or claimed to be owned by the principal or in which the principal has or claims to have an interest, including, but not limited to, power to insure against any casualty, liability or loss; to obtain or regain possession or protect the principal’s interest in the instrument by action, proceeding or otherwise; to pay, compromise or contest taxes or assessments; to apply for refunds in connection with the instrument; to consent to and participate in any reorganization, recapitalization, liquidation, merger, consolidation, sale or lease, or other change in or revival of a corporation or other association, or in the financial structure of any corporation or other association, or in the priorities, voting rights of other special rights with respect to it; to become a depositor with any protective, reorganization or similar committee of the bond, share, other instrument of similar character, commodity interest or any instrument with respect to it, belonging to the principal; to make any payments reasonably incident to the preceding provisions; to exercise or sell an option, conversion or similar right; to vote in persons or by the granting of a proxy, with or without the power of substitution, either discretionary, general or otherwise, for the accomplishment of any of the purposes enumerated in this section;

To carry in the name of a nominee selected by the agent any evidence of the ownership of any bond, share, other instrument of similar character, commodity interest or instrument with respect to it, belonging to the principal;

To employ, in any way believed to be desirable by the agent, any bond, share, other instrument of similar character, commodity interest or any instrument with respect to it, in which the principal has or claims to have any interest, for the protection or continued operation of any speculative or margin transaction personally begun or personally guaranteed, in whole or in part, by the principal;

To demand, receive or obtain by action, proceeding or otherwise, any money or other thing of value to which the principal is, or may become, or may claim to be, entitled as the proceeds of any interest in a bond, share, other instrument of similar character, commodity interest or any instrument with respect to it, or of one or more of the transactions enumerated in this section; to conserve, invest, disburse or utilize anything received for purposes enumerated in this section, and to be reimbursed for any expenditures properly made by him or her in the execution of the powers conferred on him or her by the statutory short form power of attorney;

To agree and contract, in any manner, and with any broker or other person, and on any terms, which the agent may select, for the accomplishment of any of the purposes enumerated in this section, and to perform, rescind, reform, release or modify this agreement or contract or any other similar agreement made by or on behalf of the principal;

To execute, acknowledge and deliver any consent, agreement, authorization, assignment, revocation, declaration or modification, notice, waiver of notice, check or other instrument which the agent deems useful for the accomplishment of any of the purposes enumerated in this section;

To execute, acknowledge and file any report or certificate required by law or governmental regulation;

To prosecute, defend, submit to arbitration, settle and propose or accept a compromise with respect to any claim existing in favor of, or against, the principal based on or involving any bond, share or commodity transaction or to intervene in any action or proceeding relating to it;

To hire, discharge and compensate any attorney, accountant, expert witness or other assistant or assistants when the agent deems this action to be desirable for the proper execution by him or her of any of the powers described in this section, and for the keeping of needed records of these actions; and

In general, and in addition to all the specific acts enumerated in this section, to do any other act or acts, which the principal can do through an agent, with respect to any interest in any bond, share or other instrument of similar character, commodity, or instrument with respect to a commodity.

All powers described in this section shall be equally exercisable with respect to any interest in any bond, share or other instrument of similar character, commodity, or instrument with respect to a commodity owned by the principal at the giving of the power of attorney or thereafter acquired, whether located in the state of Rhode Island or elsewhere.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 375, § 1.

18-16-6.
Banking transactions.

In a statutory short form power of attorney, the language conferring general authority with respect to banking transactions shall be construed to mean that the principal authorizes the agent:

To continue, modify and terminate any deposit account or other banking arrangement made by or on behalf of the principal prior to the creation of the agency;

To open, either in the name of the agent alone, or in the name of the principal alone, or in both their names jointly or otherwise, a deposit account of any type with any banker or in any banking institution selected by the agent; to hire any safe deposit box or vault space;

To make, sign and deliver checks or drafts for any purpose; to withdraw by check, order or otherwise any funds or property of the principal deposited with, or left in the custody of, any banker or banking institution, wherever located, either before or after the creation of the agency;

To prepare from time to time financial statements concerning the assets and liabilities or income and expenses of the principal, and to deliver the prepared statements to any banker, banking institution or other person, whom the agent reasonably believes to be entitled to them;

To receive statements, vouchers, notices or other documents from any banker or banking institution and to act with respect to them;

To have access to any safe deposit box or vault that the principal might have, if personally present;

To borrow money by bank overdraft, or by promissory note of the principal given for a period and at an interest rate that the agent may select; to give any security out of the assets of the principal that the agent deems desirable or necessary for this borrowing; to pay, renew or extend the time of payment of any note so given or given by or on behalf of the principal, and to procure for the principal a loan from any banker or banking institution by any other procedure made available by the banker or institution;

To make, assign, endorse, discount, guarantee and negotiate, for any and all purposes, all promissory notes, bills of exchange, checks, drafts or other negotiable or non-negotiable paper of the principal, or payable to the principal or to his order; to receive the cash or other proceeds of these transactions; to accept any bill of exchange or draft drawn by any person upon the principal, and to pay it when due;

To receive for the principal and deal in and deal with any receipt, warehouse receipt or other negotiable or non-negotiable instrument in which the principal has or claims to have an interest;

To apply for and receive letters of credit or travelers checks from any banker or banking institution selected by the agent and to give any indemnity or other agreements in connection with them that the agent deems desirable or necessary;

To consent to an extension in the time of payment with respect to any commercial paper or any banking transaction in which the principal has an interest or by which the principal is, or might be, affected in any way;

To pay, compromise or contest taxes or assessments and to apply for refunds in connection with them;

To demand, receive, obtain by action, proceeding or otherwise any money or other thing of value to which the principal is, or may become, or may claim to be, entitled as the proceeds of any banking transaction conducted by the principal himself, or by the agent in the execution of any of the powers described in this section, or partly by the principal and partly by the agent so acting; to conserve, invest, disburse or utilize anything received for the purposes enumerated in this section, and to be reimbursed for any expenditures properly made by him or her in the execution of the powers conferred upon him or her by the statutory short form power of attorney;

To execute, acknowledge, seal and deliver any instrument of any kind, in the name of the principal or otherwise, which the agent deems useful for the accomplishment of any of the purposes enumerated in this section;

To prosecute, defend, submit to arbitration, settle, and propose or accept a compromise with respect to, any claim existing in favor for, or against, the principal based on or involving any banking transaction, or to intervene in any action or proceeding relating to any claim;

To hire, discharge and compensate any attorney, accountant, expert witness or other assistant or assistants when the agent deems this action to be desirable for proper execution by him or her of any of powers described in this section, and for the keeping of needed records of these actions; and

In general, and in addition to all the specific acts enumerated in this section, to do any other act or acts, which the principal can do through an agent, in connection with any banking transaction which does or might in any way affect the financial or other interest of the principal.

All powers described in this section shall be equally exercisable with respect to any banking transaction engaged in by the principal at the giving of the power of attorney or thereafter engaged in, whether conducted in the state of Rhode Island or elsewhere.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 375, § 1.

18-16-7.
Business operating transactions.

In a statutory short form power of attorney, the language conferring general authority with respect to business operating transactions shall be construed to mean that the principal authorizes the agent:

To the extent that an agent is permitted by law to act for a principal, to discharge and perform any duty or liability and also to exercise any right, power, privilege or option which the principal has, or claims to have, under any contract of partnership, whether the principal is a general or special partner; to enforce the terms of any partnership agreement for the protection of the principal, by action, proceeding or otherwise, as the agent deems desirable or necessary, and to defend, submit to arbitration, settle or compromise any action or other legal proceeding to which the principal is a party because of his or her membership in the partnership;

To exercise in person or by proxy or enforce by action, proceeding or otherwise any right, power, privilege or option which the principal has as the holder of any bond, share or other instrument of similar character, and to defend, submit to arbitration, settle or compromise any action or other legal proceeding to which the principal is a party because of any bond, share or other instrument of similar character;

With respect to any business enterprise which is owned solely by the principal:

To continue, modify, renegotiate, extend and terminate any contractual arrangements made with any person, firm, association or corporation by or on behalf of the principal with respect thereto prior to the creation of the agency;

To determine the policy of the enterprise as to the location of the site or sites to be utilized for its operation, as to the nature and extent of the business to be undertaken by it, as to methods of manufacturing, selling, merchandising, financing, accounting and advertising to be employed in its operation, as to the amount and types of insurance to be carried, as to the mode of securing, compensating and dealing with accountants, attorneys, servants and other agents and employees required for its operation; to agree and contract, in any manner, and with any person and on any terms which the agent deems desirable or necessary for effectuating any or all of these decisions of the agent as to policy, and to perform, rescind, reform, release or modify any business agreement or contract or any other similar agreement or contract made by or on behalf of the principal;

To change the name or form of organization under which the business is operated and enter into a partnership agreement with other persons or organize a corporation to take over the operation of the business, or any part of it, that the agent deems desirable or necessary; and

To demand and to receive all moneys which are, or may become, due to the principal, or which may be claimed by the principal or on his or her behalf, in the operation of the enterprise, and to control and disburse any funds in the operation of the enterprise in any way which the agent deems desirable or necessary; to engage in any banking transactions which the agent deems desirable or necessary for effectuating the execution of any of the powers of the agent described in this subdivision;

To prepare, sign, file and deliver all reports, compilations of information, returns or other papers with respect to any business operating transaction of the principal, which are required by any governmental agency, department or instrumentality or which the agent deems desirable or necessary for any purpose, and to make any payments with respect to them;

To pay, compromise or contest taxes or assessments and to do any act or acts which the agent deems desirable or necessary to protect the principal from illegal or unnecessary taxation, fines, penalties or assessments in connection with his or her business operations, including power to attempt to recover, in any manner permitted by law, sums paid before or after the creation of the agency as taxes, fines, penalties or assessments;

To demand, receive or obtain by action, proceeding or otherwise any money, or other thing of value to which the principal is, or may become, or may claim to be entitled as the proceeds of any business operation of the principal; to conserve, invest, disburse or utilize anything received for the purposes enumerated in this section, and to be reimbursed for any expenditures properly made by him or her in the execution of the powers conferred upon by him or her by the statutory short form power of attorney;

To execute, acknowledge, seal and deliver any deed, assignment, mortgage, lease, notice, consent, agreement, authorization, check or other instrument which the agent deems useful for the accomplishment of any of the purposes enumerated in this section;

To prosecute, defend, submit to arbitration, settle, and propose or accept a compromise with respect to any claim existing in favor of, or against, the principal based on or involving any business operating transaction or to intervene in any action or proceeding relating to it;

To hire, discharge and compensate any attorney, accountant, expert witness or other assistant or assistants when the agent deems this action to be desirable for the proper execution by him or her of any of the powers described in this section, and for the keeping of needed records of these actions; and

In general, and in addition to all the specific acts enumerated in this section, to do any other act or acts, which the principal can do through an agent, in connection with any business operated by the principal, which the agent deems desirable or necessary for the furtherance or protection of the interests of the principal.

All powers described in this section shall be equally exercisable with respect to any business in which the principal is interested at the creation of the agency or in which the principal shall thereafter become interested, whether operated in the state of Rhode Island or elsewhere.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 375, § 1.

18-16-8.
Insurance transactions.

In a statutory short form of power of attorney, the language conferring general authority with respect to insurance transactions shall be construed to mean that the principal authorizes the agent:

To continue, pay the premium or assessment on, modify, rescind, release or terminate any contract of life, accident, health, disability or liability insurance or any combination of this insurance procured by or on behalf of the principal prior to the creation of the agency which insures either the principal or any other person, without regard to whether the principal is or is not a beneficiary under the contract;

To procure new, different or additional contracts of insurance on the life of the principal or protecting the principal with respect to ill-health, disability, accident or liability of any sort; to select the amount, the type of insurance contract and the mode of payment under each policy; to pay the premium or assessment on, modify, rescind, release or terminate any contract procured by the agent, and to designate the beneficiary of any contract of insurance; provided, no agent shall be the beneficiary unless the agent is the spouse, child, grandchild, parent, brother or sister of the principal; and provided, further, that the agent may not change the beneficiary of a policy taken out by the principal;

To apply for and receive any available loan on the security of the contract of insurance, whether for the payment of a premium or for the procuring of cash; to surrender and thereupon receive the cash surrender value; to exercise any election as to beneficiary or mode of payment; to change the manner of paying premiums; to change or to convert the type of insurance contract, with respect to any contract or life, accident, health, disability or liability insurance as to which the principal has, or claims to have, any one or more of the powers described in this section;

To demand, receive or obtain by action, proceeding or otherwise any money, dividend or other thing of value to which the principal is, or may become, or may claim to be, entitled as the proceeds of any contract of insurance or of one or more of the transactions enumerated in this section; to conserve, invest, disburse or utilize anything received for purposes enumerated in this section, and to be reimbursed for any expenditures properly made by him or her in the execution of the powers conferred on him or her by the statutory short form power of attorney;

To apply for and procure any available governmental aid in the guaranteeing or paying of premiums of any contract of insurance on the life of the principal;

To sell, assign, hypothecate, borrow upon or pledge the interest of the principal in any contract of insurance;

To pay, from the proceeds or otherwise, compromise or contest, and apply for refunds in connection with, any tax or assessment levied by a taxing authority with respect to any contract of insurance or the proceeds of it or liability accruing by reason of that tax or assessment;

To agree and contract, in any manner, and with any person and on any terms, which the agent may select for the accomplishment of any of the purposes enumerated in this section, and to perform, rescind, reform, release or modify any such agreement or contract;

To execute, acknowledge, seal and deliver any consent, demand, request, application, agreement, indemnity, authorization, assignment, pledge, notice, check, receipt, waiver or other instrument which the agent deems useful for the accomplishment of any of the purposes enumerated in this section;

To continue, procure, pay the premium or assessment on, modify, rescind, release, terminate or otherwise deal with any contract of insurance, other than those enumerated in subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection, whether fire, marine, burglary, compensation, disability, liability, hurricane, casualty, or other type, or any combination of insurance; to do any act or acts with respect to any such contract or with respect to its proceeds or enforcement which the agent deems to be desirable or necessary for the promotion or protection of the interests of the principal;

To prosecute, defend, submit to arbitration, settle and propose or accept a compromise with respect to any claim existing in favor of, or against, the principal based on or involving any insurance transaction or to intervene in any action or proceeding relating to any claim;

To hire, discharge and compensate any attorney, accountant, expert witness or other assistant or assistants when the agent deems this action to be desirable for the proper execution by him or her of any of the powers described in this section and for the keeping of needed records of these actions; and

In general, and in addition to all the specific acts enumerated in this section, to do any other act or acts, which the principal can do through an agent, in connection with procuring, supervising, managing, modifying, enforcing and terminating contracts of insurance in which the principal is the insured or is otherwise in any way interested.

All powers described in this section shall be exercisable with respect to any contract of insurance in which the principal is in any way interested, whether made in the state of Rhode Island or elsewhere.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 375, § 1.